Massachusetts, session 194th, H4488.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176D of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 3B the
following section:-
Section 3C. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Maximum allowable cost list” or “list”, a list of drugs used by a pharmacy benefits
manager in setting the maximum allowable cost upon which reimbursement to a pharmacy or
pharmacist may be based.
"Pharmaceutical wholesaler", a person or entity that sells and distributes prescription
pharmaceutical products, including without limitation a full line of brand-name, generic and
over-the-counter pharmaceuticals, and that offers regular and private delivery to a pharmacy.
“Pharmacist”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C.
of 5

“Pharmacist services”, products, goods or services provided as a part of the practice of
pharmacy.
“Pharmacy”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C.
"Pharmacy acquisition cost", the amount that a pharmaceutical wholesaler charges for a
pharmaceutical product as listed on the pharmacy's billing invoice.
“Pharmacy benefits manager”, as defined in section 226 of chapter 175.
"Pharmacy benefits manager affiliate", (i) a pharmacy or pharmacist that directly or
indirectly, through 1 or more intermediaries, owns or controls a pharmacy with a pharmacy
benefits manager; or (ii) a pharmacy that directly or indirectly, through 1 or more intermediaries,
is owned or controlled by or is under common ownership or control with a pharmacy benefits
manager.
“Pharmacy benefits plan or program”, a plan or program that pays for, reimburses, covers
the cost of or otherwise provides for pharmacist services to individuals who reside in or are
employed in the commonwealth.
(b) Before a pharmacy benefits manager places or continues to administer a particular
drug on a maximum allowable cost list, the drug shall: (i) be listed as therapeutically equivalent
and pharmaceutically equivalent “A” or "B" rated in the United States Food and Drug
Administration’s most recent version of the Orange Book or Green Book or have an NR or NA
rating by Medi-span, Elsevier Gold Standard Drug Database or a similar rating by a nationally
recognized reference; (ii) be available for purchase by each pharmacy in the commonwealth
from national or regional wholesalers operating in the commonwealth; and (iii) not be obsolete.
of 5

(c) (1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall: (i) provide access to its maximum allowable
cost list to each pharmacy subject to the list; (ii) update its maximum allowable cost list on a
timely basis, but in no event later than 7 calendar days after an increase of 10 per cent or more in
the pharmacy acquisition cost from 60 per cent or more of the pharmaceutical wholesalers doing
business in the commonwealth or a change in the methodology upon which the list is based or in
the value of a variable involved in the methodology; (iii) provide a process for each pharmacy
subject to the maximum allowable cost list to receive prompt notification of an update to the list;
and (iv) provide a reasonable administrative appeal procedure to allow pharmacies to challenge
maximum allowable costs and reimbursements made under a maximum allowable cost for a
specific drug or drugs as not meeting the requirements of this section or being below the
pharmacy acquisition cost.
(2) The reasonable administrative appeal procedure shall include a dedicated telephone
number and email address or website for the purpose of submitting administrative appeals.
Pharmacies shall be able to submit an administrative appeal directly to the pharmacy benefits
manager regarding the pharmacy benefits plan or program or through a pharmacy service
administrative organization. Pharmacies shall have no less than 7 business days to file an
administrative appeal.
(3) The pharmacy benefits manager shall respond to a challenge based on
reimbursements made under a maximum allowable cost within 7 business days after receipt of
the challenge.
(4) If a challenge is based on maximum allowable cost and the appeal is upheld, the
pharmacy benefits manager shall, within 7 business days after receipt of the challenge: (i) make
of 5

the change in the maximum allowable cost; (ii) permit the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist
to reverse and rebill the claim in question; (iii) provide the National Drug Code for the drug that
the increase or change is based upon to the pharmacy or pharmacist; and (iv) make the change in
the maximum allowable cost effective for each similarly situated pharmacy as defined by the
payor subject to the maximum allowable cost list.
(5) If a challenge is based on maximum allowable cost and the appeal is denied, the
pharmacy benefits manager shall, within 7 business days after receipt of the challenge, provide
the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist the National Drug Code for the drug and the name of the
national or regional pharmaceutical wholesalers operating in the commonwealth that have the
drug currently in stock at a price below the maximum allowable cost on the list.
(6) If the drug for which the National Drug Code provided by the pharmacy benefits
manager is not available at a price below the pharmacy acquisition cost from the pharmaceutical
wholesaler from which the pharmacy or pharmacist purchases the majority of prescription drugs
for resale, then the pharmacy benefits manager shall adjust the price on the maximum allowable
cost list to exceed the challenging pharmacy's pharmacy acquisition cost and permit the
pharmacy to reverse and rebill each claim affected by the inability to procure the drug at a cost
that is equal to or less than the previously challenged maximum allowable cost.
(d) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist in an
amount less than the amount that the pharmacy benefits manager reimburses a pharmacy benefits
manager affiliate for providing the same pharmacist services. The amount shall be calculated on
a per unit basis based on the same generic product identifier or generic code number.
of 5

(e) A pharmacy or pharmacist may decline to provide pharmacist services to a patient or
pharmacy benefits manager if, as a result of a maximum allowable cost list, a pharmacy or
pharmacist would be paid less than the pharmacy acquisition cost of the pharmacy providing
pharmacist services.
(f) This section shall apply to the pharmacy benefits manager employed by or under
contract with MassHealth or the group insurance commission if, at any time, MassHealth or the
group insurance commission engages the services of a pharmacy benefits manager to maintain a
maximum allowable cost list.
(g) A violation of this section shall be a deceptive and unfair trade practice as described
in section 2 of chapter 93A of the General Laws.
of 5